Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-252
Department of Correctional Services; convey described property.

(1) The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to sell and convey by quitclaim deed to Lancaster County, Nebraska, a tract of land located in the northwest quarter of section 9, township 9 north, range 6 east of the 6th principal meridian, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the southeast corner of the northwest quarter thence in a westerly direction with the south line of the northwest quarter, a distance of seven hundred feet; thence in a northerly direction perpendicular to the south line, a distance of thirty-three feet; thence in a northeasterly direction to a point located six hundred feet westerly from the southeast corner as measured with the south line and forty feet distant from and measured perpendicular to the south line; thence in an easterly direction parallel with the south line, a distance of five hundred feet; thence in a northeasterly direction to a point located fifty feet northerly from and measured perpendicular to the south line and forty feet westerly from and measured perpendicular to the east line of the northwest quarter; thence in a northerly direction parallel with and forty feet distant from the east line of the northwest quarter, a distance of eight hundred eighty-six and seventy-six hundredths feet; thence in a northwesterly direction to a point located eleven hundred thirty-six and seventy-six hundredths feet northerly from the southeast corner of the northwest quarter as measured with the east line and sixty feet westerly from and measured perpendicular to the east line; thence in a northeasterly direction to a point located thirteen hundred thirty-six and seventy-six hundredths feet northerly from the southeast corner as measured with the east line and forty feet westerly from and measured perpendicular to the east line; thence in a northwesterly direction to a point located one thousand nineteen and ninety-six hundredths feet southerly from the northeast corner of the northwest quarter as measured with the east line and fifty feet westerly from and measured perpendicular to the east line; thence in a northerly direction parallel with the east line, a distance of two hundred feet; thence in a northeasterly direction to a point located six hundred nineteen and sixty-nine hundredths feet southerly from the northeast corner as measured with the east line and forty feet westerly from and measured perpendicular to the east line; then in a northerly direction, parallel with the east line to a point on the north line of the northwest quarter; thence in an easterly direction on the north line to the northeast corner of the northwest quarter; thence in a southerly direction on the east line of the northwest quarter, a distance of two thousand six hundred fifty-six and seventy-two hundredths feet, more or less, to the point of beginning; containing three and twenty-four hundredths acres, more or less, of which two and fifty-two hundredths acres, more or less, is existing county road right-of-way, making a net additional right-of-way of seventy-two hundredths acre, more or less.

(2) The Department of Correctional Services may receive payments from Lancaster County for trees removed from state property in connection with this conveyance. Such payments shall be deposited in the Department of Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund to be used by the department for the purchase and planting of replacement trees.

Laws 1988, LB 854, § 1.